Tennessee, session 114, HB2547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-2-302(1), is amended by deleting
subdivision (B).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-2-302(5), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Includes rights to oil; gas; all other minerals known and recognized as
commercial minerals, including coal, lignite, and brine, underlying the land; ground
water; and surface water;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-2-302(6), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Includes rights to oil; gas; all other minerals known and recognized as
commercial minerals, including coal, lignite, and brine, underlying the land; ground
water; and surface water;
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-2-302(9), is amended by adding
"or designated by the United States department of commerce pursuant to 15 C.F.R. Part 791,
Subpart A, as amended, transferred, or succeeded" immediately following "subject to
international traffic in arms regulations under 22 C.F.R. § 126.1" wherever it appears.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-2-302(10), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
HB2547
011270
- 1 -

(10) "Prohibited foreign-party-controlled business" means any entity in which a
prohibited foreign party holds a controlling interest or significant interest or exercises
substantial control;
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-2-302(13), is amended by
deleting "interest of thirty-three percent (33%) or more" wherever it appears and substituting
"interest of ten percent (10%) or more".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-2-302(13)(C), is amended by
deleting "interest of fifty percent (50%) or more" and substituting "interest of thirty-three percent
(33%) or more".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-2-304(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) Within the later of sixty (60) days after:
(A) January 1, 2025;
(B) The date that the party is designated as a prohibited foreign party;
(C) The date that the business meets the definition of a prohibited
foreign-party-controlled business; or
(D) The date the prohibited foreign party or prohibited foreign-party-
controlled business acquires the interest in agricultural land.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-2-306(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) Within the later of sixty (60) days after:
(A) January 1, 2025;
(B) The date that the business meets the definition of a prohibited
foreign-party-controlled business; or
- 2 - 011270

(C) The date the prohibited foreign-party-controlled business acquires
the interest in non-agricultural land.
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-2-308(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b) This part does not apply to a prohibited foreign party or prohibited foreign-
party-controlled business that possesses an interest in agricultural land or non-
agricultural land if such prohibited foreign party or prohibited foreign-party-controlled
business:
(1) Is duly registered and in good standing with the secretary of state as
of the later of:
(A) January 1, 2025;
(B) The date that the party is designated as a prohibited foreign
party; or
(C) The date that the business meets the definition of a prohibited
foreign-party-controlled business; and
(2) Has:
(A) Been approved by the committee on foreign investment in the
United States (CFIUS); or
(B) Previously received a determination that there are no
unresolved national security concerns or that pending actions under
Section 721 of the Defense Production Act of 1950 (50 U.S.C. App. 2170)
are concluded with respect to a covered transaction, as defined in 31
C.F.R. § 800.213; provided, that such prohibited foreign party or
prohibited foreign-party-controlled business has not undergone a change
- 3 - 011270

in control constituting a covered control transaction, as defined in 31
C.F.R. § 800.210, since such determination.
SECTION 11. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to acts occurring on or after that date.
- 4 - 011270